Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 5. Property; Testimonial Privilege

§ 81.
Ownership of accountant’s working papers.

All statements, records, schedules, working papers, and memoranda made by a public accountant incident to or in the course of professional services to clients, except reports submitted by a public accountant to a client, are the property of the accountant. However, an express agreement between the accountant and the client to the contrary shall take precedence over this subsection.

No statement, record, schedule, working paper, or memorandum shall be sold, transferred, or bequeathed, without the consent of the client or his or her personal representative or assignee, to anyone other than one or more surviving partners or new partners of the accountant or to his or her corporation or any combined or merged partnership or successor in interest to the partnership.

Original copies of client documents in the possession of the licensee are the property of the client, and must be returned to the client upon request.

An accountant or accountancy firm shall have in place a plan for responsible disposition of client records in case of unexpected incapacity or firm dissolution.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

1991, No. 167

(Adj. Sess.), § 15;

2001, No. 129

(Adj. Sess.), § 18, eff. June 13, 2002;

2019, No. 30

, § 9.

§ 82.
Confidential communications.

No firm or any of its employees or other public accountants engaged by the firm, shall disclose any confidential information obtained in the course of a professional engagement except with the consent of the client or former client or as disclosure may be required by law, legal process, or the standards of the profession.

This section does not limit the authority of this State or of the United States to subpoena and use information in connection with any investigation, or proceedings. This section does not prohibit a public accountant whose professional competence has been challenged in a court or before an administrative agency from disclosing confidential information as a part of a defense.

Nothing in this chapter prohibits a firm or any of its employees, from disclosing any data to other public accountants, peer review teams, or partnerships or corporations of public accountants engaged in conducting peer reviews under the auspices of a recognized professional association, or any of their employees, in connection with peer reviews of the accountant’s accounting and auditing practice.

Nothing contained in this chapter prohibits a firm or any of its employees, from disclosing any data in confidence to any representative of a recognized professional association or to the Board in connection with a professional ethics investigation or in the course of a peer review.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

1991, No. 167

(Adj. Sess.), § 16;

2001, No. 129

(Adj. Sess.), § 19, eff. June 13, 2002;

2007, No. 29

, § 15.